Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2719.01
Using name of association; when prohibited.

No person, including an insurer, agent, or affiliate of an insurer, shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause directly to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in any newspaper, magazine, or other publication, in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, over any radio station or television station, or in any other way any advertisement, announcement, or statement, written or oral, which uses the existence of the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance covered by the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, except that this section shall not apply to the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association or any other entity which does not sell or solicit insurance or coverage by a health maintenance organization.

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB159, § 9.
March 13, 2019